Georgia, session 2025_26, HB627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 15 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to courts, is amended by revising
division (12)(A)(iii) of Code Section 15-11-2, relating to definitions regarding the juvenile
code, as follows:
"(iii) Aggravated assault upon an individual or situation described in subsection (d),
(h), or (k) of Code Section 16-5-21 or assault with a deadly weapon or with any
object, device, or instrument which, when used offensively against a person, actually
does result in serious bodily injury, provided that such deadly weapon is not a
firearm; and provided, further; provided, however, that such injured person is not a
public safety officer as defined in Code Section 16-5-19 and such acts are not
prohibited under subsection (c) of Code Section 16-5-21;"
H. B. 627
- 1 -

LC 48 1482
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by revising paragraphs (9) and (10) of and by adding new
paragraphs to subsection (b) of Code Section 15-11-560, relating to concurrent and original
jurisdiction of superior court, to read as follows:
"(9) Aggravated assault if committed with a firearm; upon a public safety officer as such
acts are prohibited under subsection (c) of Code Section 16-5-21; or
(10) Aggravated battery upon a public safety officer as such acts are prohibited under
subsection (c) of Code Section 16-5-24;
(11) Terroristic threats or acts if the threat or act involves or is against a public or private
school, transportation furnished by a school, a school function, or a person who, at the
time of the threat or act, is physically present in a public or private school, transportation
furnished by a school, or a school function; or
(12) Criminal attempt to commit the offenses provided in paragraph (1) and paragraphs
(4) through (8) of this subsection."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 627
- 2 -